Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Chapter 9 Railroads

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision prohibiting aid to railroad by legislature, see art. 3, § 39, Wyo. Const.

For constitutional provisions relating to railroads generally, see art. 10, §§ 11 to 19 Wyo. Const.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What causes of loss are incident to the “operation” of a railroad, within clause of contract relieving the railroad from liability, 2 ALR2d 1074.

Defense to cause of action based upon violation of statute imposing duty on railroad, 10 ALR2d 853.

Construction of statutes requiring railroads to provide for the drainage or flow of waters, 19 ALR2d 967.

Spur track agreement, liability exemption clause in, 20 ALR2d 711.

Stalled vehicle, failure of occupants to get out and move to place of safety as contributory negligence, 21 ALR2d 742.

Blinding of vehicle driver by glare of lights, 22 ALR2d 292, 64 ALR3d 551, 64 ALR3d 760.

Flagman, duty to maintain, 24 ALR2d 1161.

Liability for obstruction of stream by debris or waste causing damage by flooding or the like, 29 ALR2d 447.

Physically handicapped or intoxicated person boarding or alighting from standing train or car, 30 ALR2d 334.

Moving car or train, attempt to board, 31 ALR2d 931.

Duty of railroad to passengers to keep steps or vestibule of car free from debris or foreign substances other than snow or ice, 34 ALR2d 360.

Eminent domain, spur track and the like as constituting a use for which railroad can validly exercise right of, 35 ALR2d 1326.

Express company employee and railroad, carrier-passenger relationship as between, 36 ALR2d 1412.

Finding of decedent's body on or near tracks as creating presumption or inference of railroad's negligence, or as affecting burden of proof relating thereto, 40 ALR2d 881.

Res ipsa loquitur or doctrine of exclusive control as applied to injury or damage caused by fall of object from train, 41 ALR2d 932.

Collision of road vehicle with train or car at place other than crossing, 44 ALR2d 680.

Character or composition of train or vehicle as affecting applicability of “full crew” statutes, 45 ALR2d 436.

Status of employee or his family traveling on employer's interstate conveyance by means of pass issued pursuant to specific provision of employment or collective bargaining agreement, 55 ALR2d 766.

Sleeping-car company's liability for ejection of passenger by employee, 60 ALR2d 1115.

Contributory negligence of adult struck by train while walking or standing beside railroad track, 63 ALR2d 1226.

Voluntarily undertaking to care for injured person, 64 ALR2d 1179.

Scenic railway, roller coaster, or miniature railway, 66 ALR2d 689.

Injury or damage resulting from motor vehicle striking bridge or underpass because of insufficient vertical clearance, 67 ALR2d 1364.

Manner of timely application of proper brakes as basis of charge of contributory negligence against driver of skidding motor vehicle colliding with train, 72 ALR2d 6.

Admissibility in evidence, in civil action, of tachograph or similar paper or tape recording of speed of motor vehicle, railroad locomotive, or the like, 73 ALR2d 1025.

Carrier's liability to passenger for assault by third person, 77 ALR2d 504.

Validity of regulation of smoke or other pollution, 78 ALR2d 1305.

Vibrations attributable to operation of trains, property damage caused by, 79 ALR2d 966.

Violation of statute requiring one involved in accident to stop and render aid as affecting civil liability, 80 ALR2d 299.

Schedule, liability to passenger for failure to keep trains to, 81 ALR2d 1365.

Liability to visitor upon premises on private business with, or errand or work for, employee, 94 ALR2d 6.

Deed to railroad company as conveyance fee or easement, 6 ALR3d 973.

Contributory negligence of child injured while climbing over or through railroad train blocking crossing, 11 ALR3d 1168.

Validity, construction and effect of agreement, in connection with real-estate lease or license by railroad, for exemption from liability or for indemnification by lessee or licensee, for consequences of railroad's own negligence, 14 ALR3d 446.

What is a “train” or “train movement” within the meaning of the brake provisions (45 U.S.C. §§ 1, 9) of the Federal Safety Appliance Act, 17 ALR3d 283.

Physical condition of employee, liability of carrier for injury to or death of passenger from accident due to, 52 ALR3d 669.

Compensation for diminution in value of the remainder of property resulting from taking or use of adjoining land of others for the same undertaking, 59 ALR3d 488.

Width or design of lateral space between passenger loading platform and car entrance as affecting carrier's liability to passenger for injuries incurred from falling into space, 28 ALR4th 748.

Judicial enforcement or review of decisions of National Railroad Adjustment Board under 45 U.S.C. § 153 First, (p) and (q), or of special Adjustment Board under 45 U.S.C. § 153 Second, 9 ALR Fed 533.

Construction and application of § 16(3) of Interstate Commerce Act (49 U.S.C. § 16(3)), as amended, providing time limitations for actions between shippers and railroad and pipeline carriers, 18 ALR Fed 640.